Massachusetts, session 194th, H1696.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There shall be a commission to study and develop proposals for reparative
justice in the commonwealth through a truth and reconciliation process, to redress harms
resulting from the institution of slavery and its legacy endured by formerly enslaved citizens of
Massachusetts and their descendants. For the purposes of this act, descendants of formerly
enslaved people in the United States shall be understood to be members of the Freedmen class,
hereinafter referred to as American Freedmen. American Freedmen are that class of persons
emancipated in the United States via the 13th Amendment in 1865 or earlier, and their
descendants. Members of the commission shall be considered special state employees for
purposes of chapter 268A of the General Laws.
of 4

The commission shall develop reports documenting the effects of slavery and its legacy
on the American Freedmen class in the commonwealth. These reports shall include, but not be
limited to, the effects of slavery, domestic terrorism, political disenfranchisement, housing
segregation, separate and unequal education, pathologizing of the Freedmen families,
environmental and infrastructure partiality that disproportionately affects the Freedmen class,
control over creative cultural and intellectual life, stolen labor and hindered opportunity, an
unjust legal system, neglect, mental and physical harm, as well as the persistent and growing
wealth gap of American Freedmen.
SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of 15 members, the majority of whom shall
be members of the American Freedmen class: 11 members appointed by the governor, 1 of
whom shall have expertise in remedial justice, 1 of whom shall have expertise in genealogy, 2 of
whom shall have expertise in the history of American slavery and institutional discrimination
and systemic racism, 2 of whom shall be members of organizations concerned with remedial
justice, 1 of whom shall have expertise in forensic accounting, 1 of whom shall have expertise in
public policy, 2 of whom shall be Massachusetts residents of the American Freedmen class who
have demonstrated a commitment to advocating for remedial justice, and 1 of whom shall have
expertise in constitutional law; 2 members appointed by the president of the senate; and 2
members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.
The appointing authorities shall create a public application process, including a written
application, an interview, and thorough vetting. To the extent possible, the appointing authorities
shall appoint members to the commission who have a verified familial connection to the
American Freedmen class. The commission shall elect a chair and vice chair from among its
members.
of 4

SECTION 3. (a) The commission shall develop:
(i) proposals for remedial resolutions, including proposals for the form and amount of
reparative remedies; and
(ii) a summary of data from the truth and reconciliation process. The commission shall
consider a variety of methods, including, but not limited to, lump sum payments, yearly
payments, victims’ assistance funds, homeowners’ assistance, tuition assistance, tuition refunds,
mortgage refunds, and tax credits.
(b) The commission shall develop criteria to determine the eligibility of beneficiaries of
state reparative measures and programs and a method for application to such programs.
(c) The commission shall make recommendations for the implementation of reparative
measures, including recommendations regarding:
(i) the timeline for the implementation of such programs, with attention to how they
would function for present and future generations;
(ii) draft legislation for the implementation of such programs; and
(iii) resources and materials for educating the public on remedial justice and reparative
programs.
SECTION 4. Within 2 years, the commission shall submit a report of its findings and
recommendations, together with drafts of legislation necessary to carry out such
recommendations, to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint
committee on racial equity, civil rights, and inclusion, and the house and senate committees on
ways and means. Within 2 years, the commission shall notify the public of its findings.
of 4

SECTION 5.
(a) Quorum. A quorum for conducting business shall consist of 5 members.
(b) Compensation. Non-legislative members of the commission shall receive reasonable
per diem compensation for attendance at up to 10 meetings, subject to appropriation. Members
shall also be reimbursed for customary expenses incurred during the execution of their duties.
(c) Vacancies. Vacancies shall not impede the commission’s work and shall be filled by
the original appointing authority for the remainder of the term.
SECTION 6. The commission shall serve as a continuing resource for the commonwealth
by providing consultation to the permanent commission on the status of African Americans,
established in section 72 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, and reviewing and advising on
policies impacting the American Freedmen class to ensure equity and justice.
SECTION 7. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 4